Missouri, session 2026, SB1232.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 34, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 34.810, to read as
follows:
34.810. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Information technology", any of the following:
(a) Any computers and computer devices;
(b) A service related to the automation of an
information system, including computer software or
computers; or
(c) A telecommunications apparatus or device that
serves as a component of a voice, data, or video
communications network for transmitting, switching, routing,
multiplexing, modulating, amplifying, or receiving signals
on the network, and services related to telecommunications;
(2) "Cloud computing service", the meaning assigned by
Special Publication 800-145 issued by the National Institute
of Standards and Technology within the federal Department of
Commerce, as the definition existed on January 1, 2015;

SB 1232 2
(3) "Major information resources project", any
information resources technology project exceeding five
million dollars and that:
(a) Requires one year or longer to reach operations
status;
(b) Involves more than one department; or
(c) Substantially alters work methods of department
personnel or the delivery of services.
2. Except as provided by subsection 3 of this section,
a department shall ensure when making purchases for any
information technology or a major information resources
project that the technology or project is capable of being
deployed and run on a cloud computing service.
3. When making a purchase for any information
technology or a major information resources project, a
department may determine that, due to integration
limitations with legacy systems, security risks, or costs,
the department is unable to purchase the technology or
project capable of being deployed and run on cloud computing
services.
✓